src/fst/test/gt-norm2-yamls/V-TA-nakatêw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nakatêw - ok : # VTA (VTA4 AEW) 

###PRS###
## INDEPENDENT ##
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kinakasin # LOCAL DIR
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kinakasinân
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kinakasinân
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kinakasinâwâw

     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kinakatitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kinakatitinân
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kinakatitinân
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kinakatitinâwâw


     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO:    ninakatâw # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO:    kinakatâw
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO:    ninakatânân
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO:    kinakatânaw
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO:    kinakatâwâw
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO:    ninakatâwak # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO:    kinakatâwak
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:    ninakatânânak
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO:    kinakatânawak
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO:    kinakatâwâwak

     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ninakatimâwa # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kinakatimâwa
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ninakatimânâna
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   kinakatimânawa
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kinakatimâwâwa

     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO:    ninakatik # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO:    kinakatik
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1PlO:    ninakatikonân
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO:   kinakatikonaw
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO:    kinakatikowâw
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO:    [ninakatikowak, ninakatikwak] # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO:    [kinakatikowak, kinakatikwak]
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO:    ninakatikonânak
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO:   kinakatikonawak
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO:    kinakatikowâwak

     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ninakatimâwa # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kinakatimâwa
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ninakatimânâna
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   kinakatimânawa
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kinakatimâwâwa

     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nakatêw # THIRD DIR
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nakatêwak
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: nakatêyiwa
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    nakatimêw
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    nakatimêwak

     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    [nakatik, nakatikow] # THIRD INV
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    [nakatikowak, nakatikwak]
     nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nakatikoyiwa


## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-nakasiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-nakasiyâhk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-nakasiyâhk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-nakasiyêk

     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-nakatitân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-nakatitâhk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-nakatitâhk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-nakatitakok


     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO:    ê-nakatak # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO:    ê-nakatat
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO:    ê-nakatâyâhk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO:   ê-nakatâyahk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO:    ê-nakatâyêk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO:    ê-nakatakik # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO:    ê-nakatacik
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO:    ê-nakatâyâhkik
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO:   ê-nakatâyahkok
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO:    ê-nakatâyêkok

     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nakatimak # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nakatimat
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nakatimâyâhk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   ê-nakatimâyahk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nakatimâyêk

     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO:    ê-nakasit # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO:    ê-nakatisk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO:    ê-nakatikoyâhk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO:   ê-nakatikoyahk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO:    ê-nakatikoyêk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO:    ê-nakasicik # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO:    ê-nakatiskik
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO:    ê-nakatikoyâhkik
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO:   ê-nakatikoyahkok
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO:    ê-nakatikoyêkok

     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    ê-nakatimit # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    ê-nakatimisk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    ê-nakatikoyâhk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   ê-nakatikoyahk
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    ê-nakatikoyêk

     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nakatât # THIRD DIR
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-nakatâcik
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-nakatâyit
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    ê-nakatimât
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    ê-nakatimâcik

     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    ê-nakatikot # THIRD INV
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    ê-nakatikocik
     PV/ê+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-nakatikoyit

## FUTURE CONDITIONAL ##
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO:    nakasiyani # LOCAL DIR
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO:    nakasiyâhki
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO:    nakasiyâhki
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO:    nakasiyêko

     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO:    nakatitâni # LOCAL INVERSE
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO:    nakatitâhki
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO:    nakatitâhki
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO:    nakatitako


     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO:    nakataki # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO:    nakataci
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO:    nakatâyâhki
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO:   [nakatâyahko, nakatâyahki]
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO:    nakatâyêko
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO:    nakatakwâwi # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO:    nakatatwâwi
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO:    nakatâyâhkwâwi
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO:   nakatâyahkwâwi
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO:    nakatâyêkwâwi

     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nakatimaki # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nakatimaci
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nakatimâyâhki
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   [nakatimâyahko, nakatimâyahki]
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nakatimâyêko

     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO:    nakasici # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO:    nakatiski
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO:    nakatikoyâhki
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO:   [nakatikoyahko, nakatikoyahki]
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO:    nakatikoyêko
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO:    nakasitwâwi # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO:    nakatiskwâwi
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO:    nakatikoyâhkwâwi
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO:   nakatikoyahkwâwi
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO:    nakatikoyêkwâwi

     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    nakatimici # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    nakatimiski
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    nakatikoyâhki
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   [nakatikoyahko, nakatikoyahki]
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    nakatikoyêko

     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nakatâci # THIRD DIR
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nakatâtwâwi
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: nakatâyici
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    nakatimâci
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    nakatimâtwâwi

     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    nakatikoci # THIRD INV
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    nakatikotwâwi
     nakatêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nakatikoyici

## IMPERATIVE ##
#LOCAL IMMEDIATE#
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:    nakasin
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:    nakasinân
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:    nakasinân
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:    nakasik
#LOCAL DELAYED#
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO:    nakasîhkan
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO:    nakasîhkâhk
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO:    nakasîhkâhk
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO:    nakasîhkêk

#MIXED IMMEDIATE#
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:    nakas # Obj. Sg.
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:    nakatihk
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:   nakatâtân

     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:    nakasik # Obj. Pl.
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:    nakatihkik
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:   nakatâtânik
#MIXED DELAYED#
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO:    nakatâhkan # Obj. Sg.
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO:    nakatâhkêk
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO:   nakatâhkahk

     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO:    nakatâhkanik # Obj. Pl.
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO:    nakatâhkêkok
     nakatêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO:   nakatâhkahkok


###PRT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kikî-nakasin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kikî-nakasinân
     PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kikî-nakasinân
     PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kikî-nakasinâwâw

     PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kikî-nakatitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kikî-nakatitinân
     PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kikî-nakatitinân
     PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kikî-nakatitinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-kî-nakasiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-kî-nakasiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-kî-nakasiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-kî-nakasiyêk

     PV/ê+PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-kî-nakatitân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-kî-nakatitâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-kî-nakatitâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-kî-nakatitakok


###FUT+INT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kiwî-nakasin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kiwî-nakasinân
     PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kiwî-nakasinân
     PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kiwî-nakasinâwâw

     PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kiwî-nakatitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kiwî-nakatitinân
     PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kiwî-nakatitinân
     PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kiwî-nakatitinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-wî-nakasiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-wî-nakasiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-wî-nakasiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-wî-nakasiyêk

     PV/ê+PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wî-nakatitân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wî-nakatitâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wî-nakatitâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nakatêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wî-nakatitakok


###FUT+DEF###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/ka+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kika-nakasin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ka+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kika-nakasinân
     PV/ka+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kika-nakasinân
     PV/ka+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kika-nakasinâwâw

     PV/ka+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kika-nakatitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ka+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kika-nakatitinân
     PV/ka+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kika-nakatitinân
     PV/ka+nakatêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kika-nakatitinâwâw
